District of Columbia statutes.
1-531.01

Reimbursement for representation by Office of Labor Relations and Collective Bargaining.

(a)

Any agency that is represented by the Office of Labor Relations and Collective Bargaining (“OLRCB”) in third-party cases, grievances, and dispute resolution shall pay the cost of representation established through an intradistrict agreement with the OLRCB.

(b)

Beginning in Fiscal Year 2003, the OLRCB shall calculate and assess the costs for representing agencies under the direct personnel authority of the Mayor in third-party cases, grievances, and dispute resolution. The OLRCB shall negotiate the cost of representing an independent agency in third-party cases, grievances, and dispute resolution with the independent agency.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 3802, 49 DCR 6968